Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1002
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that the abandonment of railroad rights-of-way in this state provides a unique opportunity to develop a statewide system of recreational trails by which citizens of Nebraska may enjoy the greenways or linear parks that will result and that such trails may act to preserve wildlife habitat and create conservation corridors. The Legislature further finds that it is in the public's interest to develop abandoned railroad rights-of-way and to do so through fostering public and private cooperation.

Laws 1991, LB 714, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-1502;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 377.
January 1, 2010